src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON VIHTTAVIDATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#viđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#viđát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#viđát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#viđát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#viđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#viđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#viđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#viđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#viđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>t#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jn#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#viđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#viđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#viđat#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#viđat#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#viđat#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#viđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#viđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#viđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#viđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#viđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>t#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jn#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#viđat#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON VIHTTAGUDATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#guđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#guđát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#guđát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#guđát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:htta#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:htta#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:htta#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#guđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#guđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#guđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#guđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#guđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#guđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#guđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#guđat#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#guđat#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#guđat#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:htta#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:htta#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:htta#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#guđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#guđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#guđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#guđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#guđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#guđat#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON VIHTTACIHCCETLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#čihččet#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#čihččet#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#čihččet#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#čihččet#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#čihččet#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:htta#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:htta#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:htta#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#čihččet#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#čihččet#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#čihččet#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#čihččet#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#čihččet#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#čihččet#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON VIHTTAGAVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#gávccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#gávccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#gávccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#gávccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#gávccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:htta#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:htta#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:htta#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#gávccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#gávccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#gávccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#gávccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#gávccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#gávccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON VIHTTAOVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#ovccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#ovccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#ovccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#ovccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#ovccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:htta#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:htta#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:htta#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#ovccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#ovccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#ovccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#ovccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#ovccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#ovccát#logi%>n K ;
